North Carolina, session 2025, SB859.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-257. Coverage of dialysis.
(a) A health benefit plan offered in this State that provides coverage for hemodialysis,
peritoneal dialysis, or both shall provide coverage for this service in all settings, including home
dialysis.
(b) Staff-assisted home dialysis provided using trained professionals is required to be
covered, at a minimum, for individuals who meet any of the following criteria:
(1) The individual is blind or visually impaired.
(2) The individual has a cognitive or neurological impairment.
(3) The individual has any illness or injury that reduces mobility."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2026, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:
…
(8a) G.S. 58-3-257, Coverage of dialysis.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2026, and applies as of the start
of the next plan year following that date.
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the State Treasurer the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to implement the coverage required under
Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*S859-v-1*